District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.54

Employment-at-will.

(a)

An appointment to a position in the Management Supervisory Service shall be an at-will appointment. Management Supervisory Service employees shall be given a 15-day notice prior to termination. Upon termination, a person with Career or Educational Service status, or with Excepted Service status due to appointment as an attorney pursuant to § 1-609.09, may retreat, at the discretion of the personnel authority, within 3 months of the effective date of the termination, to a vacant position within the agency to which he or she was promoted for which he or she is qualified.

(b)

An individual appointed to the Management Supervisory Service pursuant to this section may be paid severance pay upon separation for non-disciplinary reasons according to the length of the individual’s employment with the District government as follows:

Length of Employment                Maximum Severance
Up to 6 months                2 weeks of the employee’s basic pay
6 months to 1 year                4 weeks of the employee’s basic pay
1 to 3 years                8 weeks of the employee’s basic pay
More than 3 years                10 weeks of the employee’s basic pay.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 954
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-115, § 2(f), 59 DCR 461
1981 Ed., § 1-610.54.
D.C. Law 19-115 repealed subsec. (b), which formerly read:
“(b) Employees appointed to the Management Supervisory Service shall be given severance pay in accordance with subchapter XI of this chapter upon separation for non-disciplinary reasons.”
Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.